Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5764YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2207 Section 1. Section 558.1B, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âPrivate equity entityâ means a 3 corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, 4 real estate investment trust, investment fund, or other legal 5 entity, other than an individual, that pools capital from one 6 or more investors for the purpose of acquiring residential real 7 property for investment, rental, or resale. 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. âSingle-family residenceâ means a 9 residential dwelling designed for occupancy by one household 10 and located on property zoned for single-family residential 11 use, including a detached dwelling or townhouse, but excluding 12 duplexes, multifamily dwellings, and condominiums. 13 Sec. 2. Section 558.41, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Private equity entity acquisition 16 restrictions. A county recorder shall not record a deed 17 conveying a single-family residence to a private equity entity 18 unless the deed is accompanied by a sworn affidavit executed by 19 the grantee and grantor affirming that the acquisition complies 20 with section 558.73. 21 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 558.73 Purchase restrictions on 22 single-family residences. 23 1. a. A private equity entity shall not purchase, contract 24 to purchase, or otherwise acquire a single-family residence 25 during the first seventy-five days that the residence is listed 26 for sale on the open market. 27 b. The seventy-five-day period begins on the date the 28 single-family residence is first offered for sale through a 29 multiple listing service, licensed real estate broker, or 30 publicly accessible listing platform. 31 c. A private equity entity shall not evade the requirements 32 of this section through the use of subsidiaries, affiliates, 33 or agents. 34 2. A private equity entity acquiring a single-family 35 -1- LSB 5764YH (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2207 residence shall submit a sworn affidavit stating either of the 1 following: 2 a. The acquisition occurs after the expiration of the 3 seventy-five-day period required under subsection 1. 4 b. The acquisition is otherwise exempt under state or 5 federal law. 6